cs: Kompatibilní systém nášlapných pedálů: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Silniční 3šroubové univerzální; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero / Light Action / Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Univerzální (vícesměrné uvolnění); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Jiné
ko: 클립리스 페달 시스템과 호환됩니다.: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; 로드 3볼트 일반형; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay(Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; 범용(멀티 릴리스); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; 기타
pt-PT: Sistema de pedais de encaixe compatível: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Genérico de estrada 3 parafusos; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (libertação múltipla); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Outro
de: Kompatibles Klickpedalsystem: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Rennrad 3-Loch (generisch); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (Multi-Release); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Sonstige
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém pedálov bez klipsov: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Cestný 3-skrutkový univerzálny; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Univerzálny (viacsmerné uvoľnenie); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Iné
zh-TW: 相容的自鎖踏板系統: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; 一般公路車 3 孔; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; 通用 (多向脫卡); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; 其他
pt-BR: Sistema de pedais de encaixe compatível: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Estrada genérico com 3 parafusos; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (multiliberação); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Outro
es: Sistema de pedales automáticos compatible: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Carretera genérico de 3 tornillos; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (multiliberación); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Otro
ro-RO: Sistem de pedale fără clipuri compatibil: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Șosea 3 șuruburi generic; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (eliberare multiplă); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Altele
fr: Système de pédales automatiques compatible: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Route 3 vis générique; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero / Light Action / Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universel (déclenchement multidirectionnel); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместима система за педали без щипки: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Шосеен стандартен с 3 болта; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Универсална (многопосочно освобождаване); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Друго
lt-LT: Suderinama bekontakčių pedalų sistema: Crankbrothers Eggbeater / Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Plentui, 3 varžtų universalūs; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero / Light Action / Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universalūs (kelių krypčių atsegimo); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Kita
th: ระบบบันไดแบบคลิปเลสที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; บันไดเสือหมอบแบบ 3 โบลต์ทั่วไป; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; อเนกประสงค์ (ปลดคลีตได้หลายทิศทาง); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 兼容的自锁脚踏系统: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; 公路车 3 孔通用; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; 通用（多向释放）; VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilan sustav pedala bez kopči: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Cestovne s 3 vijka (generičke); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Univerzalno (višestruko otpuštanje); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Ostalo
ru: Совместимая система контактных педалей: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Шоссейные стандартные (3 винта); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Универсальная (многонаправленное выстегивание); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Другое
ja: 互換性のあるクリップレスペダルシステム: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; ロード用3つ穴 (汎用); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; 汎用 (マルチリリース); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; その他
en: Compatible clipless pedal system: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Road 3-bolt generic; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (multi-release); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Other
nl: Compatibel klikpedaalsysteem: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Race 3-bouts universeel; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universeel (multi-release); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Overig
vi: Hệ thống bàn đạp không kẹp tương thích: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Đua 3 chốt phổ thông; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Đa năng (tháo đa hướng); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Khác
hu: A kompatibilis be- és kikattintható pedálrendszer típusa: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Országúti 3 csavaros (általános); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Univerzális (többirányú oldás); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Egyéb
pl: Kompatybilny system pedałów zatrzaskowych: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Szosowe na 3 śruby (uniwersalne); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Uniwersalne (wielokierunkowe wypinanie); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Inne
tr: Uyumlu klipsiz pedal sistemi: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Yol bisikleti 3 cıvatalı (genel); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Evrensel (çoklu kilit açma); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Diğer
nb: Kompatibelt klikkfritt pedalsystem: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Landevei 3-bolts (generisk); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero / Light Action / Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universell (flerveis utløsning); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Annet
sv: Kompatibelt klickfritt pedalsystem: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Generisk 3-bult för landsväg; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universell (multi-release); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Annat
it: Sistema di pedali a sgancio rapido compatibile: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Strada a 3 bulloni generico; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universale (sgancio multiplo); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Altro
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem pedal brez sponk: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Cestni 3 vijaki (generično); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Univerzalno (večkratno odpenjanje); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Drugo
fi: Yhteensopiva lukoton poljinjärjestelmä: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Yleinen 3-pulttinen maantie; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero / Light Action / Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universaali (monisuuntainen irrotus); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Muu
da: Kompatibelt klemmeløst pedalsystem: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Landevej 3-bolt (generisk); Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Universal (multi-release); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Andet
el: Συμβατό σύστημα πεντάλ χωρίς κλιπ: Crankbrothers Eggbeater/Candy; Favero Assioma; Garmin Rally; HT X1/X2; Look Delta; Look Keo; Mavic; Ritchey; Γενικής χρήσης δρόμου 3 βιδών; Shimano SPD; Shimano SPD-SL; Speedplay (Zero/Light Action/Wahoo); Time ATAC; Time ICLIC; Γενικής χρήσης (πολλαπλής απελευθέρωσης); VP Delta; Wellgo SPD; Xpedo; Άλλο